Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.48.311.
Rights not transferable.

The right to engage in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture is considered a personal and individual right, based on the qualifications of the individual as evidenced by the individual’s certificate of registration, which is not transferable.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.48.320.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.321.
Evidence of practice.

A person practices or offers to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture who

practices a branch of the profession of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture as defined in AS

08.48.341

;

by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or other means represents to be an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect, or through the use of some other title implies that the person is an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect; or

holds out as able to perform or who does perform an architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural service recognized by the professions covered by this chapter, and specified in regulations of the board, as an architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural service.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 69 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

Sec. 08.48.330.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.331.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to

a contractor performing work designed by a professional architect, engineer, or landscape architect or the supervision of the construction of the work as a supervisor or superintendent for a contractor;

workers in building trades crafts, earthwork, grounds keeping, or nursery operations, and superintendents, supervisors, or inspectors in the performance of their customary duties;

an officer or employee of the United States government practicing architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture as required by the person’s official capacity;

an employee or a subordinate of a person registered under this chapter if the work or service is done under the direct supervision of a person registered under this chapter;

associates, consultants, or specialists retained by a registered individual, a partnership of registered individuals, a corporation, a limited liability company, or a limited liability partnership authorized to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture under this chapter, in the performance of professional services if responsible charge of the work remains with the individual, the partnership, or a designated representative of the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership;

a person preparing drawings or specifications for

a building for the person’s own use and occupancy as a single family residence and related site work for that building;

farm or ranch buildings and their grounds unless the public health, safety, or welfare is involved;

a building that is intended to be used only as a residence by not more than

four families and that is not more than two stories high and the grounds of the building; or

two families and that is not more than three stories high and the grounds of the building, if the building is located in a municipality that has adopted a building or residential code that applies to the building and if the building complies with the building or residential code;

a garage, workshop, or similar building that contains less than 2,000 square feet of floor space to be used for a private noncommercial purpose and the grounds of the building;

a specialty contractor licensed under AS 08.18 while engaged in the business of construction contracting for work designed by an architect, engineer, or landscape architect that is within the specialty to be performed or supervised by the specialty contractor, or a contractor preparing shop or field drawings for work that the specialty contractor has contracted to perform;

a person furnishing drawings, specifications, instruments of service, or other data for alterations or repairs to a building or its grounds that do not change or affect the structural system or the safety of the building, or that do not affect the public health, safety, or welfare;

a person who is employed by a postsecondary educational institution to teach engineering, architectural, or landscape architectural courses; in this paragraph, “postsecondary educational institution” has the meaning given in AS

14.48.210

;

an officer or employee of an individual, firm, partnership, association, utility, corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, who practices engineering, architecture, land surveying, or landscape architecture involved in the operation of the employer’s business only, and further provided that neither the employee nor the employer offers engineering, architecture, land surveying, or landscape architecture services to the public; exclusions under this paragraph do not apply to buildings or structures whose primary use is public occupancy;

a person while involved in revegetation, restoration, reclamation, rehabilitation, or erosion control for disturbed land that the board determines does not affect the public health, safety, or welfare;

a person while maintaining or directing the placement of plant material that the board determines does not affect the public health, safety, or welfare;

an employee, officer, or agent of a regulatory agency of the state or a municipality when reviewing drawings and specifications for compliance with the building codes of the state or a municipality if the drawings and specifications have been sealed and signed by an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect or the preparation of the drawings and specifications is exempt under this section from the requirements of this chapter; in this paragraph, “building codes” includes codes relating to building, mechanical, plumbing, electrical, fire safety standards, and zoning;

a person who is designing fire detection or suppression systems and is authorized by the Department of Public Safety to design fire detection or suppression systems.

The requirement to be registered as a landscape architect under this chapter only applies to a person who practices an aspect of landscape architecture that the board has determined affects the public health, safety, or welfare.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 2 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 36 SLA 1997; am §§ 25, 26 ch 47 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 38 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 6, 2014, in (a)(7), substituted “construction contracting for work designed by an architect, engineer, or landscape architect that is within” for “construction contracting or designing systems for work within”, in (a)(10), twice added “, architecture, land surveying, or landscape architecture” following “engineering”, in (a)(11) and (a)(12), added “that the board determines does not affect the public health, safety, or welfare” at the end of each, in (a)(13), substituted “have been sealed and signed by an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect” for “have been signed and sealed by a professional architect or professional engineer”, and “fire safety standards, and zoning” for “and fire standards” at the end; in (b), added “or welfare” at the end; made related changes.

Sec. 08.48.340.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.341.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“architect” means a professional architect;

“board” means the State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors;

“building” means a structure used or intended for human occupancy;

“certificate of authorization” means a certificate issued by the board authorizing a corporation, a limited liability company, or a limited liability partnership to provide professional services in architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture through individuals legally registered by the board;

“certificate of registration” means a certificate issued by the board recognizing the individual named in the certificate as meeting the requirements for registration under this chapter;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“design of minor importance” means a design that is incidental to the discipline of a registrant and is within the discipline of the registrant, but does not include comprehensive design services of any particular building type, structure, building system, engineering system, or site development;

“engineer” means a professional engineer;

“land surveyor” means a professional land surveyor;

“landscape architect” means a professional landscape architect;

“limited liability company” means an organization organized under AS 10.50 or a foreign limited liability company; in this paragraph, “foreign limited liability company” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“limited liability partnership” means a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership, as those terms are defined in AS

32.06.995

;

“practice of architecture” means professional service or creative work in the design of buildings, the teaching of advanced architectural courses in institutions of higher learning, consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and professional observation of construction of public or private buildings, works, or projects, and architectural review of drawings and specifications by regulatory agencies; “practice of architecture” may by regulation of the board include mechanical, electrical, or structural design of minor importance;

“practice of engineering” means professional service or creative work, the adequate performance of which requires the specialized knowledge of applied mathematics and sciences, dealing with the design of structures, machines, equipment, utilities systems, materials, processes, works, or projects, public or private; the teaching of advanced engineering courses in institutions of higher learning; the direction of or the performance of engineering surveys, consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and professional observation of construction of public and private structures, works, or projects and engineering review of drawings and specifications by regulatory agencies; “practice of engineering” may by regulation of the board include architectural building design of minor importance, but it does not include comprehensive architectural services;

“practice of land surveying” means the teaching of land surveying courses at an institution of higher learning, or any service or work the adequate performance of which involves the application of special knowledge of the principles of mathematics, the related physical and applied sciences, and the relevant requirements of law for adequate evidence of the act of measuring and locating land, geodetic and cadastral surveys for the location and monumentation of property boundaries, for the platting and planning of land and subdivisions of land, including the topography, alignment, and grades for streets, and for the preparation and perpetuation of maps, record plats, field note records, and property descriptions that represent these surveys;

“practice of landscape architecture” means professional services or creative work in site investigation, reconnaissance, research, planning, design, and preparation services related to drawings and construction documents, observation of construction, and location, arrangement, and design of incidental and necessary tangible objects and features for the purpose of

preservation and enhancement of land uses and natural land features;

location and construction of aesthetically pleasing and functional approaches for structures, roadways, and walkways;

establishing or maintaining trails, plantings, landscape irrigation, landscape lighting, and landscape grading; or

generalized planning of the development of land areas in a manner that is sensitive to the area’s natural and cultural resources;

“professional architect” means a person who has been legally registered as a professional architect by the board;

“professional engineer” means a person who has been legally registered as a professional engineer by the board;

“professional land surveyor” means a person who has been legally registered as a professional land surveyor by the board;

“professional landscape architect” means a person registered as a professional landscape architect by the board;

“responsible charge” means the direct control and personal supervision of work;

“shop drawing” or “field drawing” means a drawing prepared by a contractor, subcontractor, or vendor that shows how a particular aspect of the work is to be fabricated and installed and demonstrates how an aspect of the work will satisfy the requirements of the construction document, but does not include a final drawing, specification, survey, plat, plate, report, or other similar document;

“structure” means a system of materials and components that resists horizontal and vertical loads.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 2 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 69 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 36 SLA 1997; am §§ 27, 28 ch 47 SLA 1998; am §§ 9, 10 ch 38 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 58 SLA 2010; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2014; am § 27 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 2000, 2014, and 2019 to maintain
alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education for professional architects, engineers, and landscape architects, see 12 AAC 36, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 6, 2014, added present (6) and (21).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added (23) [now 6].

Sec. 08.48.350.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.351.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Architects, Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Landscape Architects Registration Act.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 29 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Secs. 08.48.360 — 08.48.430.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]